Hawaii statutes.
§671-18 Statute of limitations tolled. The
filing of the inquiry with the medical inquiry and conciliation panel or with
an approved or agreed upon alternative dispute resolution provider shall toll
any applicable statute of limitations, and the statute of limitations shall
remain tolled until sixty days after the termination of the panel or the
notification of completion from the approved or agreed upon alternative dispute
resolution provider is mailed or delivered to the parties. If panel proceedings
are not completed within twelve months, or the alternative dispute resolution
process is not completed within twelve months, the statute of limitations shall
resume running and the party filing the inquiry may commence a suit based on
the circumstances related to the inquiry in any appropriate court of this
State. The panel or the approved or agreed upon alternative dispute resolution
provider shall notify all parties in writing of this provision. [L 1976, c 219,
pt of §2; am L 1980, c 88, §2; am L 2003, c 211, §4; am L 2012, c 296, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next